Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-804
Bridges in cities and villages; construction and repair by counties.

The county board may, in its discretion, whenever there is sufficient money on hand in the county road fund, build or repair any bridge or bridges within the limits of any incorporated city or village in its county.

Laws 1879, § 58, p. 133;

R.S.1913, § 2975;

C.S.1922, § 2733;

C.S.1929, § 39-820;

R.S.1943, § 39-804.